Maine, session 132, LD674.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
Administration - Archives 0050
Initiative: Provides one-time appropriations for 2 limited-period Archivist II positions and
related All Other costs to create a history education and learning mobile unit within the
Maine State Archives. These positions will end June 30, 2027.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $205,145 $211,710
All Other $44,855 $38,290
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $250,000 $250,000